Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2293
Court order; fees.

Upon entry of a deferred judgment pursuant to section 29-2292 or 29-4803, the court shall order the defendant to pay all administrative and programming fees authorized under section 29-2262.06, unless waived under such section. The defendant shall pay any such fees to the clerk of the court. The clerk of the court shall remit all fees so collected to the State Treasurer for credit to the Probation Program Cash Fund.

Laws 2019, LB686, § 10;

Laws 2024, LB253, § 11.